Maine, session 132, LD2189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1822-B is enacted to read:
§1822-B. Notice of termination of or change in maternity or newborn care services
1. Termination of maternity or newborn care services. A hospital shall file with
the department at least 120 days prior to the effective date of the termination of maternity
or newborn care services a notice setting forth the following information:
A. The effective date of the proposed termination and the reason for the termination;
B. The name, title, e-mail address and phone number for a contact person at the
hospital;
C. The hospital's plan for emergency care, including the development and review of
policy and procedure for maternity emergencies and training for emergency department
and family practice staff on emergency obstetric care;
Page 1 - 132LR3020(05)

D. A list and descriptions of notifications sent to surrounding hospitals within 50 miles
and Level II, Level III and Level IV newborn nursery units, to any local emergency
management, fire and law enforcement services and to any registered patients that are
affected by the termination; and
E. A description of how the hospital provided public notification of the termination.
2. Change in level of care of maternity or newborn care services. A hospital shall
file with the department at least 120 days prior to the effective date of a change in the level
of care of maternity or newborn care services a notice setting forth the following
information:
A. The effective date of the proposed change in the level of care and the reason for the
change;
B. The name, title, e-mail address and phone number for a contact person at the
hospital;
C. A list and descriptions of notifications sent to surrounding hospitals within 50 miles
and Level II, Level III and Level IV newborn nursery units, to any local emergency
management, fire and law enforcement services and to any registered patients that are
affected by the change; and
D. A description of how the hospital provided public notification of the change.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR3020(05)